Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2732.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Repeal Section 41-3026.07, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 2. Title 41, chapter 27, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-3032.11, to read: START_STATUTE41-3032.11. Arizona state board of pharmacy; termination July 1, 2032 A. The Arizona state board of pharmacy terminates on July 1, 2032. B. Title 32, chapter 18 and this section are repealed on January 1, 2033. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Purpose Pursuant to section 41-2955, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, the legislature continues the Arizona state board of pharmacy to promote the safe and professional practice of pharmacy in this state. Sec. 4. Retroactivity Sections 1 and 2 of this act apply retroactively to from and after July 1, 2026.